Louisiana, session 2026, HB805.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:351 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§351. Limitation on size of containers of beverages of high alcoholic content;
standards of fill
Except for wines, no manufacturer or wholesaler in this state shall have in his
possession any beverages of high alcoholic content outside of his bonded stockroom
unless they are in containers of no greater capacity than one and seventy-five one
hundredths liters. The standards of fill shall be the following:
(1)(a) All distilled spirits sold in or shipped into this state shall be in the
following containers: One and seventy-five hundredths liters, one liter, seven
hundred fifty milliliters, seven hundred milliliters, five hundred milliliters, three
hundred seventy-five milliliters, two hundred milliliters, and fifty milliliters.
(b) If any supplier ships a particular brand of a distilled spirit into this state
in a three hundred seventy-five milliliter container, he shall thereafter be prohibited
from shipping that brand of beverage into the state in a five hundred milliliter
container.
(c) If any supplier offers for sale in this state a particular product of a
distilled spirit in a seven hundred fifty milliliter container, the particular product of
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 805 ENROLLED
distilled spirit shall not also be offered for sale in a seven hundred milliliter container
at the same time, provided the supplier is given time to fully transition.
(2)(a) All wine, sold in or shipped into this state shall be in the following
containers: twenty liters, nineteen and five-tenths liters, eighteen liters, seventeen
liters, sixteen liters, fifteen liters, fourteen liters, thirteen liters, twelve liters, eleven
liters, ten liters, nine liters, eight liters, seven liters, six liters, five liters, four liters,
three liters, one and five-tenths liters, one liter, seven hundred fifty milliliters, five
hundred milliliters, three hundred seventy-five milliliters, three hundred fifty-five
milliliters, two hundred fifty milliliters, and one hundred eighty-seven milliliters.
(b) "Vintage wines"--wines bottled prior to December 31, 1978 may be
shipped into the state in containers not less than the equivalent of one hundred
eighty-seven milliliters provided the proper proof of bottling dates is furnished in
writing to the secretary in advance of the shipment and provided the secretary
authorizes in writing that this merchandise may be shipped into the state.
(c) The provisions of this Section shall not apply to the imported alcohol
beverage "Sake".
(3)(a) Distilled spirits, whether domestically bottled or imported, subject to
the metric standard of fill prescribed in Paragraph (1) of this Section shall be packed
with the following number of containers per shipping case or container:
Container sizes Containers per case
1.75 liters 6
1.00 liters not more than 12
750 milliliters not more than 12
700 milliliters not more than 12
375 milliliters not more than 24
355 milliliters 24
200 milliliters not more than 48
100 milliliters not more than 48
50 milliliters 60
50 milliliters 120
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 805 ENROLLED
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph, "container" shall mean any receptacle
produced and manufactured with any substance used to package distilled spirits for
delivery to the public.
(c) The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to package spirit-based
beverages with an alcohol content below six percent.
(4)(a) Wines bottled subject to the standards of fill prescribed in Paragraph
(2) of this Section shall be packed with the following number of containers per
shipping case or shipping container:
Container sizes Containers per case
5 through 20 liters 1
4 liters 4
3 liters not more than 6
1.5 liters not more than 6
1 liter not more than 12
750 milliliters not more than 12
500 milliliters 12
375 milliliters 24
355 milliliters 24
250 milliliters 24
200 milliliters not more than 48
187 milliliters 48
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph, "container" shall mean any receptacle
produced and manufactured with any substance used to package wine for delivery
to the public.
(5) Upon application, in duplicate, approved by the secretary, the bottles per
case requirements set forth in Paragraphs (3) and (4) of this Section may be waived
if good cause can be shown by the bottler or importer.
(6) Any standard of fill as to size of containers for beverages of high
alcoholic content approved by the United States Treasury Department, Bureau of
Alcohol, Tobacco Tax and Firearms may be shipped into the state of Louisiana for
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 805 ENROLLED
the purposes of storage for shipment beyond the borders of the state of Louisiana.
Only those sizes listed in Paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this Section may be sold
under the provisions of these Paragraphs to licensed retail dealers or to licensed
wholesale dealers who are licensed in the state of Louisiana.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Part or any other provisions of law
to the contrary, the secretary may, for good cause shown, after proper application by
a bottler or importer and an official hearing, waive the container limitations for a
period not to exceed seven consecutive days. Only standards of fill as to size of
containers for beverages of high alcoholic content approved by the United States
Department of the Treasury, Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms may be
allowed, provided these fill allowables are not in conflict with this Section.
(9) The container restrictions provided for in this Section shall not apply to
cider products.
(10) No container sold in or shipped into this state shall include powdered
alcohol.
A. (1) All distilled spirits and wines sold, offered for sale, or shipped into this
state shall conform to the standards of fill authorized by the United States
Department of the Treasury, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau, as set
forth in Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended.
(2) Any container size authorized for domestic sale by the Alcohol and
Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau is authorized for sale in this state.
(3) No additional limitation shall be imposed by the state on container size
or case configuration except as expressly provided in this Section.
B. (1) The state shall not prescribe the number of containers per shipping case
or shipping container for distilled spirits or wine, provided such container sizes
comply with federal law.
(2) The commissioner may adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act necessary for tax administration, public safety, or enforcement
purposes, provided such rules do not conflict with federally authorized standards of
fill.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 805 ENROLLED
C.(1) For purposes of this Section,"vintage wine" is wine bottled prior to
December 31, 1978 and may be shipped into this state in container sizes not
otherwise authorized by federal standards of fill, provided that all of the following
conditions are met:
(a) The container is not smaller than the equivalent of one hundred
eighty-seven milliliters.
(b) Written proof of the bottling date is furnished to the commissioner prior
to shipment.
(c) The commissioner provides written authorization for such shipment.
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall permit the sale of vintage wine in a
container smaller than one hundred eighty-seven milliliters.
D.(1) The container size restrictions prescribed in this Section do not apply
to alcohol beverages labeled and sold as "sake".
(2) Sake may be sold in any container size authorized for importation and
sale under federal law.
E. The container size restrictions prescribed in this Section do not apply to
cider products.
F. No alcoholic beverage sold in or shipped into this state shall contain
powdered alcohol.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.